Utah statutes.
58-73-501.   Unprofessional conduct.
Unprofessional conduct is as defined in Section 58-1-501, as defined by
division rule, and also includes:
(1)  engaging in practice as a chiropractic physician after electing to place
his license on inactive status, without having established with the board that
he has initiated or completed continuing education necessary to reinstate
active status of his license;
(2)  failing to complete required continuing professional education;
(3)  violating any of the scope of practice standards set forth in Section
58-73-601;
(4)  failing to maintain patient records in sufficient detail to clearly
substantiate a diagnosis, all treatment rendered to the patient in accordance
with the recognized standard of chiropractic care, and fees charged for
professional services;
(5)  refusing to divulge to the division on demand the means, methods, device,
or instrumentality used in the treatment of a disease, injury, ailment, or
infirmity, unless that information is protected by the physician-patient
privilege of Utah and the patient has not waived that privilege;
(6)  refusing the division or its employees access to his office, instruments,
laboratory equipment, appliances, or supplies at reasonable times for purposes
of inspection;
(7)  fraudulently representing that curable disease, sickness, or injury can
be cured in a stated time, or knowingly making any false statement in
connection with the practice of chiropractic;
(8)  offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat a disease, injury,
ailment, or infirmity by a secret means, method, device, or instrumentality;
(9)  willfully and intentionally making any false statement or entry in any
chiropractic office records or other chiropractic records or reports;
(10)  knowingly engaging in billing practices which are abusive and represent
charges which are fraudulent or grossly excessive for services rendered;
(11)  performing, procuring, or agreeing to procure or perform, or advising,
aiding in or abetting, or offering or attempting to procure or aid or abet in
the procuring of a criminal abortion;
(12)  willfully betraying or disclosing a professional confidence or violation
of a privileged communication, except:
(a)  as required by law; or
(b)  to assist the division by fully and freely exchanging information
concerning applicants or licensees with the licensing or disciplinary boards
of other states or foreign countries, the Utah chiropractic associations,
their component societies, or chiropractic societies of other states,
countries, districts, territories, or foreign countries;
(13)  directly or indirectly giving or receiving any fee, commission, rebate,
or other compensation for professional services not actually rendered or
supervised, but this subsection does not preclude the legal relationships
within lawful professional partnerships, corporations, or associations; and
(14)  knowingly failing to transfer a copy of pertinent and necessary medical
records or a summary of them to another physician when requested to do so by
the subject patient or his designated representative.
